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CIRCUIT INSPECTION

DTC C 1511 / 11 SteeringAngleSensorMalfunction

CIRCUITDESCRIPTION
TheVGRSECUreceives thesteeringsensorsignals (SS 1,
SS2, SS3), and judges the steering condition to drive the VGRS
actuator.
When the steering sensor signal is abnormal, the VGRS ECU
records the DTC and illuminates the VGRS warning light.

DTC No. DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area

C1511/11
The system detects a momentary interruption of the steer-
inganglesensorsignal (SS 1,SS2,SS3) 10 times,oran
opencircuit formore than0. 12sec.

SSteeringanglesensor
SSteeringanglesensorcircuit
SVGRSECU
SSkidcontrolECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE
HINT:
S Determine the troubleareabychecking thesteeringsensorsignalusinghand −held tester.
S Whennotusinghand −held tester,go tostep3.

1 Observe thedata forSS 1,SS2,SS3onthehand −held tester.

PREPARATION:
(a)Connect thehand −held tester to theDLC3.
(b) Start the engine.
CHECK:
Checkeachsteeringsensorsignal (SS 1,SS2,SS3)whileslowly turning thesteeringwheel.
OK:

STRSENS 1:HighorLow
STR SENS2: High or Low
STR SENS3: High or Low

All OK A

All NG B

Other C

A Replace VGRS ECU.

C Go to step 3.

B

Proceed to step 2.
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2 Inspect power supply voltage of steering angle sensor.

HINT:
S When a malfunction is found in the power supply voltage

of the steering angle sensor, the sensor outputs become
abnormal.

S The power supply has 2 systems, IG and BAT.
PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b) Disconnect the steering angle sensor connector (C20).
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
(a) Measure voltage between terminals 1 and 2 of the steer-

ing angle sensor harness side connector.
OK:

10 to 14 V

(b) Measure voltage between terminals 9 and 2 of the steer-
ing angle sensor harness side connector.

OK:
10 to 14 V

OK A

NG (IG power supply terminals 1 and 2) B

NG (BAT power supply terminals 9 and 2) C

B Check or replace harness or connector.

C Go to step 4.

A

Proceed to step 3.



F17609

SS1

SS2

SS3

ESS

Steering Angle Sensor Connector
(C20)

DI−376
−DIAGNOSTICS VARIABLE GEAR RATIO STEERING

LAND CRUISER (W/G) SUP (RM970E)

3 Inspect output of steering angle sensor.

HINT:
Check the output when slowly turning the steering wheel to
judge whether the sensor is good.
PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b) Disconnect the VGRS ECU connector (V17).
(c) Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
When slowly turning the steering wheel, measure the resis-
tance between terminals of the steering angle sensor connec-
tor (C20).
OK:

Symbols
(Terminals No.)

Resistance

SS1 − ESS
(6) − (2)

SS2 − ESS
(14) − (2)

Alternates below 1 k� and above 100 k�

SS3 − ESS
(7) − (2)

OK Go to step 8.

NG

Replace steering angle sensor.
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4 Check voltage between terminal +BO and GND of VGRS ECU.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal +BO and GND of the
VGRS ECU.
OK:

10 to 14V

OK Check and repair the wire harness and connec-
tor between steering angle sensor and VGRS
ECU.

NG

5 Check voltage between terminal +BI and GND of VGRS ECU.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal +BI and GND of the
VGRS ECU.
OK:

10 to 14 V

OK Replace VGRS ECU.

NG

Proceed to step 6.
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6 Check voltage between terminal +BO and GND of skid control ECU.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal +BO and GND of the
skid control ECU.
OK:

10 to 14 V

OK Check and repair the wire harness and connec-
tor between skid control ECU and VGRS ECU.

NG

7 Check voltage between terminal +BI and GND of skid control ECU.

PREPARATION:
Turn the ignition switch ON.
CHECK:
Measure the voltage between terminal +BI and GND of the skid
control ECU.
OK:

10 to 14 V

OK Replace skid control ECU.

NG

Repair or replace +BI circuit.
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8 Check for open or short circuit in harness and connector between steering angle
sensor and VGRS ECU (See page IN−38).

PREPARATION:
(a) Turn the ignition switch OFF.
(b) Disconnect the steering angle sensor connector and VGRS ECU connector.
CHECK:
Check the continuity between each terminal SS1, SS2 and SS3 of the steering angle sensor connector and
the VGRS ECU connector.
OK:

Continuity

CHECK:
Check the continuity between each terminal SS1, SS2 and SS3 of the VGRS ECU connector and body
ground.
OK:

No continuity

NG Repair or replace harness and connector.

OK

Replace VGRS ECU.


